Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-9,116
Applicability of sections.

Sections 79-993 to 79-996 and the changes to sections 79-978, 79-988, 79-991, 79-992, 79-999, and 79-9,105 and to section 79-1057 as such section existed immediately before May 30, 1987, made by Laws 1987, LB 298, shall not apply to employees retiring prior to May 30, 1987.

Laws 1987, LB 298, § 11;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1060.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 651.